Missouri, session 2026, HB3374.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 68, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 68.330, to read as follows:
68.330. 1. A covenant agreement for incentivized development under this
chapter that is supported by bonds, leases, payments in lieu of taxes, or exemptions shall
include a provision prohibiting use of the facilities for detention, corrections, or civil
confinement for a period of three years from the date of the agreement.
2. The provisions of subsection 1 of this section shall not apply if the following
entities agree to an exemption:
(1) The port authority board, in a public hearing;
(2) The governing body of the municipality in which the port authority facility is
located; and
(3) The governing bodies of a majority of affected taxing jurisdictions.
3. A violation of subsection 1 of this section without meeting the requirements for
exemption under subsection 2 of this section shall result in:
(1) Automatic termination of any incentives;
(2) A clawback equal to the value of incentives already realized; and
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 3374 2
(3) Liquidated damages payable to the taxing jurisdictions, if ordered by a court
of competent jurisdiction.
✔